Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.18
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; unlawful practices; director; waiver, when.

Nothing in the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act shall be construed as requiring the director to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings for minor violations of such act when he or she believes that the public interest will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 18, p. 1045;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 19;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 37;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 26.
March 17, 2026